Vermont, session 2025-2026, H232.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 20 V.S.A § 49a is added to read:
§ 49a. VERMONT MUNICIPAL RESPONSE AND RECOVERY SPECIAL
FUND
VT LEG #380429 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.232
2025 Page 2 of 3
(a) There is created the Vermont Municipal Response and Recovery
Special Fund that shall be managed in accordance with 32 V.S.A. chapter 7,
subchapter 5. Annually, 0.5 percent of General Fund revenue shall be
deposited and credited to the Special Fund. Notwithstanding 32 V.S.A.
§ 588(3), all interest earned on Special Fund balances shall be credited to the
Special Fund. The State Treasurer may accept gifts, donations, and grants
from any source, public or private, to be dedicated for deposit into the Special
Fund. Monies in the Special Fund shall be used solely for direct support and
assistance to qualifying municipalities for flood response, recovery, and
resiliency projects and for necessary costs incurred in administering the Fund.
(b) Monies in the Special Fund shall not be disbursed prior to July 1, 2026.
Sec. 2. STATE TREASURER; REPORT ON USE OF VERMONT
MUNICIPAL RESPONSE AND RECOVERY SPECIAL FUND
On or before December 1, 2025, the State Treasurer shall submit a written
report to the House Committee on Government Operations and Military
Affairs and the Senate Committee on Government Operations concerning:
(1) proposed uses and limitations for the Vermont Municipal Response
and Recovery Special Fund;
(2) guidelines on how Special Fund monies may be distributed to
achieve geographic equity and a balance between flood response and
mitigation projects;
VT LEG #380429 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.232
2025 Page 3 of 3
(3) any recommendations for legislation to amend current programs,
such as the Community Resilience and Disaster Mitigation Grant Program, to
authorize direct assistance from the Special Fund to qualifying municipalities
for flood recovery projects;
(4) any recommendations for other State programs that could be
amended to provide priority access to State funds for flood-impacted
communities; and
(5) any recommendations for legislation to simplify the application
process for all State grants that may support municipal flood recovery and
resilience projects.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380429 v.1